Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 60 Miscellaneous Proceedings Relating to Property
18-60-808. Alternative procedure.

(a)

In lieu of the procedure set forth in this section and §§18-60-801 —18-60-807, at the time the complaint is filed and summons issued, a petitioner may obtain a notice issued by the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is filed. The notice shall be served with the complaint and summons and shall notify the defendant that an order of delivery of the property described in the complaint is sought and that if any objection is made to issuance of the order of delivery it must be in the form of a written response, filed within five (5) days of service of the summons and complaint, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, with a copy served on the plaintiff's attorney.

(b)(1)

In the event no written objection is filed and served within the five-day period, the clerk shall, upon the request of the plaintiff or his or her attorney, issue the writ forthwith.

(2)

In the event a defendant files a written objection within the five-day period specified, the clerk shall, at the request of either party, set the matter for hearing before the circuit judge as promptly as the business of the judge shall permit.

(c)

At the hearing the judge shall proceed in the manner specified in §18-60-806.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2123.

18-60-809. Replevin.

The plaintiff in an action to recover the possession of specific personal property, at the commencement of the action or at any time before judgment, may claim the immediate delivery of the property, as provided in §§18-60-810 —18-60-822.

History.

Civil Code, § 202; C. & M. Dig., § 8639; Pope's Dig., § 11372; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2101.

18-60-810. Affidavit for replevin.

(a)

An order for the delivery of property to the plaintiff shall be made by the clerk when there is filed in his or her office an affidavit of the plaintiff, or of someone in his or her behalf, showing:

(1)

A particular description of the property claimed;

(2)

Its actual value and the damages which the affiant believes the plaintiff ought to recover for the detention thereof;

(3)

That the plaintiff is the owner of the property or has a special ownership or interest therein, stating the facts in relation thereto, and that he or she is entitled to the immediate possession of the property;

(4)

That the property is wrongfully detained by the defendant, with the alleged cause of the detention thereof, according to the best knowledge, information, and belief of the affiant;

(5)

That it has not been taken for a tax or fine against the plaintiff, or under any order or judgment of a court against him or her, or seized under an execution or attachment against his or her property, or, if so seized, that it is by statute exempt from seizure;

(6)

That the plaintiff's cause of action has accrued within three (3) years; and

(7)

When the action is brought to recover property taken under an execution, the fact of the taking and the nature of the process under which it was done.

(b)

When the delivery of several articles of property is claimed, the affidavit must state the value of each.

History.

Civil Code, §§ 203, 204; Acts 1871, No. 48, § 1 [203], p. 219; 1887, No. 29, § 1, p. 31; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8640, 8641; Pope's Dig., §§ 11373, 11374; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-2102, 34-2103.

18-60-811. Order for delivery of property.

(a)

The order for the delivery of the property to the plaintiff shall be addressed and delivered, with a copy thereof, to the sheriff. It shall state the names of the parties to the action and the court in which the action is brought and direct the sheriff to take the property, describing it and stating its value as in the affidavit of the plaintiff, and deliver it to him or her, to make return of the order on a day to be named therein and to summon the defendant to appear on this day in the court and answer the plaintiff in the premises.

(b)(1)

If the plaintiff shall file an additional affidavit that he or she believes the property has been concealed, removed, or disposed of in any way with intent to defeat the plaintiff's action, the clerk or magistrate shall insert a clause commanding the sheriff, or other officer, that if the property mentioned in the order cannot be had, to take the body of the defendant, so that he or she appear at the return day of the order to answer the premises.

(2)

The order shall be made returnable as an order of arrest is directed to be returned.

History.

Civil Code § 205; Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 86, § 1, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., § 8642; Pope's Dig., § 11375; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2104.

18-60-812. Bond.

(a)

The order shall not be complied with by the sheriff until there has been executed in his or her presence, by one (1) or more sufficient sureties of the plaintiff, a bond to the defendant, to the effect that the plaintiff shall duly prosecute the action and that he or she shall perform the judgment of the court therein by returning the property, if a return thereof shall be adjudged, and by paying any sums of money adjudged against him or her in the action, not exceeding double the value of the property and the costs of the action.

(b)

When the action is brought against a sheriff or other officer to recover possession of property taken by him or her under an execution against a person other than the plaintiff, the bond provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be to the effect that the plaintiff shall duly prosecute the action and that he or she shall perform the judgment of the court therein by returning the property, if a return thereof shall be adjudged, and by paying to the defendant or to the plaintiff in the execution, as may be directed by the court, any sums of money adjudged against the plaintiff in the action, not exceeding double the value of the property and the costs of the action.

History.

Civil Code, §§ 206, 207; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8643, 8646; Pope's Dig., § 11376, 11379; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-2105, 34-2106.

Cross References.

Exemption of banks and savings and loan institutions from bond requirements, §23-32-301 et seq.

Form.

The section does not prescribe any set form of words for a delivery bond and conditions named therein not required by the section may, when severable, be treated as surplusage. O'Brien v. Alford, 114 Ark. 257, 169 S.W. 774 (1914).

18-60-813. Execution of order.

(a)

The sheriff shall execute the order by taking the property therein mentioned, if it is found in the possession of the defendant, or his or her agent, or of any other person who obtained possession thereof from the defendant, directly or indirectly, after the order was placed in the sheriff's hands.

(b)

The sheriff shall also deliver a copy of the order to the defendant, or to the person from whose possession the property is taken, or, if neither can be found, leave it at the usual place of abode of either, with some person of the age of at least sixteen (16).

History.

Civil Code, § 208; C. & M. Dig., § 8647; Pope's Dig., § 11380; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2107.

18-60-814. Orders directed to other counties.

(a)

At any time before judgment an order may be directed to any other county for the delivery of the property claimed.

(b)

Several orders may issue at the same time, or successively, at the option of the plaintiff, but only one (1) of the orders shall be taxed in the costs, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

Civil Code, § 214; C. & M. Dig., § 8652; Pope's Dig., § 11385; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2114.

18-60-815. Disposition of property replevied.

If the affidavit of the plaintiff states that the property was taken under an execution, the sheriff shall deliver it to the plaintiff. In every other case the sheriff shall retain the property in his or her possession for two (2) days, unless the bond mentioned in §18-60-816 shall be sooner executed.

History.

Civil Code, § 209; C. & M. Dig., § 8648; Pope's Dig., § 11381; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2108.

18-60-816. Redelivery bond.

(a)(1)

Within two (2) days after the taking of the property by the sheriff, in the case in which the property was not taken under an execution, the defendant or anyone for him or her may cause a bond to be executed to the plaintiff in the presence of the sheriff, by one (1) or more sufficient sureties, in double the value of the property, to the effect that the defendant shall perform the judgment of the court in the actions.

(2)

Thereupon the sheriff shall restore the property to the defendant or to the person in whose possession it was found.

(b)(1)

If the bond is not executed within the time provided in subsection (a) of this section, the sheriff shall deliver the property to the plaintiff.

(2)

The sheriff shall return the bonds with the order.

History.

Civil Code, § 210; C. & M. Dig., § 8649; Pope's Dig., § 11382; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2109.

18-60-817. Appraisement of property before taking bond.

(a)

Before taking any bond, upon the suggestion of either party that the value of the property is not truly stated in the order for its delivery and where the suggestion is on the part of the defendant, on his or her producing the property to the sheriff, the sheriff shall select three (3) disinterested housekeepers to appraise the property under oath, to be administered by him or her.

(b)

The housekeepers' appraisement, endorsed upon the order, shall be regarded as the value of the property in taking the bonds.

History.

Civil Code, § 211; C. & M. Dig., § 8650; Pope's Dig., § 11383; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2110.

18-60-818. Claim of third party to property.

(a)(1)

If a person other than the defendant or his or her agent claims the property taken by the sheriff and delivers to the sheriff his or her affidavit that he or she is entitled to the possession thereof, the sheriff shall not be bound to keep the property or deliver it to the plaintiff unless the plaintiff shall, within two (2) days after the delivery to him or her or to his or her agent or attorney, by the sheriff, of a copy of the affidavit, indemnify the sheriff against the claim by a bond, executed by one (1) or more sufficient sureties, in double the value of the property.

(2)

No claim to the property by a person other than the defendant or his or her agent shall be valid against the sheriff unless so made.

(b)

The sheriff shall return the affidavit of the claimant, with his or her proceedings thereon, to the clerk's office.

History.

Civil Code, § 213; C. & M. Dig., § 8651; Pope's Dig., § 11384; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2111.

18-60-819. Arrest and discharge of defendant.

(a)

If the property described in the order shall have been removed or concealed so that the officer cannot make delivery thereof, when the order contains a capias clause, the officer shall arrest the body of the defendant and hold him or her in custody in the same manner as on a capias ad respondendum in a personal action until the defendant shall execute the bond prescribed in subsection (b) of this section or be otherwise legally discharged.

(b)

The defendant shall be entitled to be discharged from arrest at any time before final judgment had in the cause upon executing to the officer who shall have made the arrest, with the addition of his or her name of office, a bond in a penalty of at least double the value of the property described as sworn to in the affidavit, with such security as shall be approved by the officer, conditioned that the defendant shall abide the order and judgment of the court in the action and that he or she will cause special bail to be put in, if it is required.

History.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 86, §§ 2, 3, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8644, 8645; Pope's Dig., §§ 11377, 11378; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-2112, 34-2113.

18-60-820. Judgments generally.

(a)

In an action to recover the possession of personal property, judgment for the plaintiff may be for the delivery of the property, or for the value thereof in case a delivery cannot be had, and damages for the detention.

(b)

When the property has been delivered to the plaintiff and the defendant claims a return thereof, judgment for the defendant may be for the return of the property, or its value, in case a return cannot be had, and damages for the taking and withholding of the property.

History.

Civil Code, § 420; C. & M. Dig., § 8654; Pope's Dig., § 11387; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2116.

18-60-821. Judgment against sureties.

(a)(1)

In all actions for the recovery of personal property, where the defendant has given a delivery bond as provided for by §18-60-816, the court or jury trying the cause may render judgment against the defendant for the recovery of the property, or its value, together with all damages sustained by the detention thereof.

(2)

Upon motion of the plaintiff the court or jury may also render judgment against the sureties upon the defendant's delivery bond for the value of the property and also for damages as they may be found and determined by the court or jury trying the cause.

(b)

If, upon the trial of any replevin cause, judgment is given for the defendant in the action, the court or jury trying the cause may render judgment, not only against the plaintiff for the value of the property taken under the order of delivery in the case, provided it has not been surrendered to the defendant, upon bond, as provided for in §18-60-816, together with all damages sustained by the defendant in the action, but may, upon motion of the defendant, also render judgment against the sureties upon the bond of the plaintiff, for the value of the property and all damages sustained by the defendant in the action.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 12, §§ 1, 2, p. 16; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8655, 8656; Pope's Dig., §§ 11389, 11390; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-2117, 34-2118.

18-60-822. Assessment of value and damages.

In actions for recovery of specific personal property, the jury must assess the value of the property, and the damages for taking or detention, whenever, by their verdict, there will be a judgment for the recovery or return of the property.

History.

Civil Code, § 362; C. & M. Dig., § 8653; Pope's Dig., § 11386; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2115.

Subchapter 9

— Vacating Public Utility Easements

Cross References.

Public utilities, §14-199-101 et seq.

18-60-901. Petition to vacate.

(a)

The owners of realty that is encumbered by a public utility easement and located outside the boundaries of any city or town may petition the county court to vacate the public utility easement.

(b)

The petition shall clearly describe the easement.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 494, § 1.

18-60-902. Notice.

(a)

Upon receipt of the petition, the county clerk shall promptly give notice by publication at least one (1) time a week for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation within the county.

(b)(1)

The notice shall state that the petition has been filed and that on a certain day named in the notice the county court will hear all persons desiring to be heard on the question of whether the public utility easement should be vacated.

(2)

The notice shall give the names of property owners signing the petition and shall clearly describe the easement.

(c)

If the easement is in favor of a specific utility, the owners of the realty must give actual notice to that utility as a condition precedent to vacating the easement.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 494, § 2.

18-60-903. Hearing — Order — Appeal.

(a)

At the hearing, the county court shall hear all interested parties and, if the court determines that the easement has not been used by the public utility for a period of at least five (5) years and that vacating the easement would not be against the interest of the public, the court shall enter an order vacating the easement and establishing the amount of just compensation for the easement.

(b)

The finding and order of the county court shall be conclusive on all parties having or claiming any rights or interest in the easement.

(c)(1)

Within thirty (30) days from the entry of the county court order, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, where a trial de novo without a jury shall be conducted by the judge of the circuit court.

(2)

An appeal may be taken from the circuit court to the Supreme Court within thirty (30) days from the entry of the order.

(d)

The cost of the publication of the notice, the cost of recording of the orders, and the court costs shall be paid by the petitioners, except that the court cost necessitated by an appeal shall be paid by the party or parties who unsuccessfully contest the petition.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 494, § 3.

18-60-904. Effect of order — Removal of property.

(a)

When the county court issues an order vacating a public utility easement, the ownership of the real property through which the easement extends shall cease to be burdened with the easement.

(b)

The public utilities shall remove their property located on or beneath the realty subject to the easement within ninety (90) days after the issuance of the order vacating the easement, or the property shall be forfeited to the owners of the realty.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 494, § 4.

Subchapter 10

— Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015, No. 107, § 4: Jan. 1, 2016.

18-60-1001. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1002. Definitions.

In this subchapter:

(1)(A)

“Ascendant” means an individual who precedes another individual in lineage, in the direct line of ascent from the other individual.

(B)

“Ascendant” includes an adoptive parent and his or her ascendants.

(2)

“Collateral” means an individual who is related to another individual under §28-9-214 but who is not the other individual's ascendant or descendant.

(3)(A)

“Descendant” means an individual's child, grandchild, and any other, however remotely related to such an individual, who is in a direct line of descent from him or her, including lineal descendants and excluding ascendants and collaterals.

(B)

“Descendant” includes an adopted child and his or her descendants.

(4)

“Determination of value” means a court order determining the fair market value of heirs property under §18-60-1006 or §18-60-1010 or adopting the valuation of the property agreed to by all cotenants.

(5)

“Heirs property” means real property held in tenancy in common which satisfies all of the following requirements as of the filing of a partition action:

(A)

there is no agreement in a record binding all the cotenants which governs the partition of the property;

(B)

one or more of the cotenants acquired title from a relative, whether living or deceased; and

(C)

any of the following applies:

(i)

20 percent or more of the interests are held by cotenants who are relatives;

(ii)

20 percent or more of the interests are held by an individual who acquired title from a relative, whether living or deceased; or

(iii)

20 percent or more of the cotenants are relatives.

(6)

“Partition by sale” means a court-ordered sale of the entire heirs property, whether by auction, sealed bids, or open-market sale conducted under §18-60-1010.

(7)

“Partition in kind” means the division of heirs property into physically distinct and separately titled parcels.

(8)

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(9)

“Relative” means an ascendant, descendant, or collateral or an individual otherwise related to another individual by marriage or law of this state other than this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1003. Applicability — Relation to other law.

(a)

This subchapter applies to partition actions filed on or after January 1, 2016.

(b)

In an action to partition real property under §18-60-401 et seq., the court shall determine whether the property is heirs property. If the court determines that the property is heirs property, the property must be partitioned under this subchapter unless all of the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.

(c)

This subchapter supplements §18-60-401 et seq. and, if an action is governed by this subchapter, replaces provisions of §18-60-401 et seq. that are inconsistent with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1004. Service — Notice by posting.

(a)

This subchapter does not limit or affect the method by which service of a complaint in a partition action may be made.

(b)

If the plaintiff in a partition action seeks notice by publication and the court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not later than 10 days after the court's determination, shall post and maintain while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject of the action. The sign must state that the action has commenced and identify the name and address of the court and the common designation by which the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1005. Commissioners.

If the court appoints commissioners pursuant to §18-60-401 et seq., each commissioner, in addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to commissioners in §18-60-401 et seq., must be disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a participant in the action.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1006. Determination of value.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if the court determines that the property that is the subject of a partition action is heirs property, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property by ordering an appraisal pursuant to subsection (d).

(b)

If all cotenants have agreed to the value of the property or to another method of valuation, the court shall adopt that value or the value produced by the agreed method of valuation.

(c)

If the court determines that the evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by the cost of the appraisal, the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.

(d)

If the court orders an appraisal, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate appraiser registered in this state to determine the fair market value of the property assuming sole ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of the appraisal, the appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the court.

(e)

If an appraisal is conducted pursuant to subsection (d), not later than 10 days after the appraisal is filed, the court shall send notice to each party with a known address, stating:

(1)

the appraised fair market value of the property;

(2)

that the appraisal is available at the clerk's office; and

(3)

that a party may file with the court an objection to the appraisal not later than 30 days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the objection.

(f)(1)

Except as provided in subsection (h), if an appraisal is filed with the court pursuant to subsection (d), the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the fair market value of the property not sooner than thirty (30) days after a copy of the notice of the appraisal is sent to each party under subsection (e).

(2)

In addition to the court-ordered appraisal, the court may consider any other evidence of value offered by a party.

(g)

After a hearing under subsection (f), but before considering the merits of the partition action, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.

(h)

The court may waive the hearing required under subsection (f) if no defendant or cotenant enters a court appearance or files an objection to the appraisal.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1; 2017, No. 1106, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (f) as (f)(1) and (f)(2); in (f)(1), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, if” for “If” and deleted “whether or not an objection to the appraisal is filed under subdivision (e)(3)” following “subsection (e) of this section” at the end; and added (h).

18-60-1007. Cotenant buyout.

(a)

If any cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value under §18-60-1006, the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.

(b)

Not later than 45 days after the notice is sent under subsection (a), any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may give notice to the court that it elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.

(c)

The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that requested partition by sale is the value of the entire parcel determined under §18-60-1006 multiplied by the cotenant's fractional ownership of the entire parcel.

(d)

After expiration of the period in subsection (b), the following rules apply:

(1)

If only one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall notify all the parties of that fact.

(2)

If more than one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall allocate the right to buy those interests among the electing cotenants based on each electing cotenant's existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants electing to buy and send notice to all the parties of that fact and of the price to be paid by each electing cotenant.

(3)

If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall send notice to all the parties of that fact and resolve the partition action under §18-60-1008(a) and (b).

(e)

If the court sends notice to the parties under subdivision (d)(1) or (2), the court shall set a date, not sooner than 60 days after the date the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants must pay their apportioned price into the court. After this date, the following rules apply:

(1)

If all electing cotenants timely pay their apportioned price into court, the court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons entitled to them.

(2)

If no electing cotenant timely pays its apportioned price, the court shall resolve the partition action under §18-60-1008(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.

(3)

If one or more but not all of the electing cotenants fail to pay their apportioned price on time, the court shall give notice to the electing cotenants that paid their apportioned price of the interest remaining and the price for all that interest.

(f)

Not later than 20 days after the court gives notice pursuant to subdivision (e)(3), any cotenant that paid may elect to purchase all of the remaining interest by paying the entire price into the court. After the 20-day period, the following rules apply:

(1)

If only one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall issue an order reallocating the remaining interest to that cotenant. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating the interests of all of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them.

(2)

If no cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall resolve the partition action under §18-60-1008(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.

(3)

If more than one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest among those paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant's original fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total original fractional ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the remaining interest. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating all of the cotenants' interests, disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them, and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court.

(g)

Not later than 45 days after the court sends notice to the parties pursuant to subsection (a), any cotenant entitled to buy an interest under this section may request the court to authorize the sale as part of the pending action of the interests of cotenants named as defendants and served with the complaint but that did not appear in the action.

(h)

If the court receives a timely request under subsection (g), the court, after hearing, may deny the request or authorize the requested additional sale on such terms as the court determines are fair and reasonable, subject to the following limitations:

(1)

a sale authorized under this subsection may occur only after the purchase prices for all interests subject to sale under subsections (a) through (f) have been paid into court and those interests have been reallocated among the cotenants as provided in those subsections; and

(2)

the purchase price for the interest of a nonappearing cotenant is based on the court's determination of value under §18-60-1006.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1008. Partition alternatives.

(a)

If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not purchased by other cotenants pursuant to §18-60-1007, or if after conclusion of the buyout under §18-60-1007, a cotenant remains that has requested partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the court, after consideration of the factors listed in §18-60-1009, finds that partition in kind will result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group. In considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a request by two or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.

(b)

If the court does not order partition in kind under subsection (a), the court shall order partition by sale pursuant to §18-60-1010 or, if no cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall dismiss the action.

(c)

If the court orders partition in kind pursuant to subsection (a), the court may require that one or more cotenants pay one or more other cotenants amounts so that the payments, taken together with the value of the in-kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the partition in kind just and proportionate in value to the fractional interests held.

(d)

If the court orders partition in kind, the court shall allocate to the cotenants that are unknown, unlocatable, or the subject of a default judgment, if their interests were not bought out pursuant to §18-60-1007, a part of the property representing the combined interests of these cotenants as determined by the court and this part of the property shall remain undivided.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1009. Considerations for partition in kind.

(a)

In determining under §18-60-1008(a) whether partition in kind would result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court shall consider the following:

(1)

whether the heirs property practicably can be divided among the cotenants;

(2)

whether partition in kind would apportion the property in such a way that the aggregate fair market value of the parcels resulting from the division would be materially less than the value of the property if it were sold as a whole, taking into account the condition under which a court-ordered sale likely would occur;

(3)

evidence of the collective duration of ownership or possession of the property by a cotenant and one or more predecessors in title or predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives of the cotenant or each other;

(4)

a cotenant's sentimental attachment to the property, including any attachment arising because the property has ancestral or other unique or special value to the cotenant;

(5)

the lawful use being made of the property by a cotenant and the degree to which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant could not continue the same use of the property;

(6)

the degree to which the cotenants have contributed their pro rata share of the property taxes, insurance, and other expenses associated with maintaining ownership of the property or have contributed to the physical improvement, maintenance, or upkeep of the property; and

(7)

any other relevant factor.

(b)

The court may not consider any one factor in subsection (a) to be dispositive without weighing the totality of all relevant factors and circumstances.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1010. Open-market sale, sealed bids, or auction.

(a)

If the court orders a sale of heirs property, the sale must be an open-market sale unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids or an auction would be more economically advantageous and in the best interest of the cotenants as a group.

(b)

If the court orders an open-market sale and the parties, not later than 10 days after the entry of the order, agree on a real estate broker licensed in this state to offer the property for sale, the court shall appoint the broker and establish a reasonable commission. If the parties do not agree on a broker, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate broker licensed in this state to offer the property for sale and shall establish a reasonable commission. The broker shall offer the property for sale in a commercially reasonable manner at a price no lower than the determination of value and on the terms and conditions established by the court.

(c)

If the broker appointed under subsection (b) obtains within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value:

(1)

the broker shall comply with the reporting requirements in §18-60-1011; and

(2)

the sale may be completed in accordance with state law other than this subchapter.

(d)

If the broker appointed under subsection (b) does not obtain within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value, the court, after hearing, may:

(1)

approve the highest outstanding offer, if any;

(2)

redetermine the value of the property and order that the property continue to be offered for an additional time; or

(3)

order that the property be sold by sealed bids or at an auction.

(e)

If the court orders a sale by sealed bids or an auction, the court shall set terms and conditions of the sale. If the court orders an auction, the auction must be conducted under §18-60-401 et seq.

(f)

If a purchaser is entitled to a share of the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser is entitled to a credit against the price in an amount equal to the purchaser's share of the proceeds.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1011. Report of open-market sale.

(a)

Unless required to do so within a shorter time by §18-60-401 et seq., a broker appointed under §18-60-1010(b) to offer heirs property for open-market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven days after receiving an offer to purchase the property for at least the value determined under §18-60-1006 or §18-60-1010.

(b)

The report required by subsection (a) must contain the following information:

(1)

a description of the property to be sold to each buyer;

(2)

the name of each buyer;

(3)

the proposed purchase price;

(4)

the terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any owner financing;

(5)

the amounts to be paid to lienholders;

(6)

a statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the broker's commission; and

(7)

other material facts relevant to the sale.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1012. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1013. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This subchapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.

18-60-1014. Effective date.

This subchapter takes effect January 1, 2016.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 107, §
1.